Hawaii statutes.
[§486-135] Reciprocal acceptance of
certificates. Whenever in any other state that licenses public
weighmasters or measuremasters there is statutory authority for the recognition
and acceptance of the certificates issued by measuremasters of this State, the
board is authorized to recognize and accept the certificates of that state. [L
1991, c 153, pt of §7]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next